Montana, session 2025, HB452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Assault on employee of public utility. (1) A person commits the
offense of assault on an employee of a public utility, as defined in 69-3-101, if the person purposely or
knowingly causes:
(a) bodily injury to an employee of a public utility;
(b) reasonable apprehension of serious bodily injury in an employee of a public utility by use of:
(i) a weapon; or
(ii) what reasonably appears to be a weapon;
(c) bodily injury to an employee of a public utility with a weapon; or
(d) serious bodily injury to an employee of a public utility.
(2) (a) A person convicted of assault on an employee of a public utility:
(i) under subsection (1)(a), (1)(b)(i), or (1)(c) shall be imprisoned in the state prison for a term not
to exceed 10 years and may be fined an amount not to exceed $50,000; or
(ii) under subsection (1)(b)(ii) shall be imprisoned in the state prison for a term not to exceed 8
years and may be fined an amount not to exceed $50,000.
(b) Except as provided in 46-18-222, a person convicted of assault on an employee of a public
utility under subsection (1)(d) of this section shall be fined an amount not to exceed $50,000 or be imprisoned
in the state prison for a term not to exceed 20 years, or both.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 45, chapter 5, part 2, and the provisions of Title 45, chapter 5, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 452

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 452.1
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 452